Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3073.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; COMMUNITY STABILIZATION PROJECT.new text end new text begin $100,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Housing Finance Agency for a grant to the Community Stabilization Project in the city of St. Paul to provide assistance to tenants and landlords. The funding provided in this section must: new text end new text begin (1) provide landlords with access to the necessary guidance and tools to comply with rental housing regulations; new text end new text begin (2) promote sustainable and efficient property management practices; new text end new text begin (3) enhance landlord-tenant relationships to reduce disputes, reduce rental turnover, and encourage the use of mediation to resolve disputes; and new text end new text begin (4) help landlords obtain rental payments by providing budgeting for at-risk tenants to improve stability, assist tenants in accessing rental assistance programs, and help renters obtain payment plans for tenants who are behind on payment. new text end